Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.340.030

Application—Review by the superintendent of public instruction.

(1) Eligible school districts desiring to form a cooperative project pursuant to RCW 28A.340.020 through 28A.340.070 shall submit to the superintendent of public instruction an application for review as a cooperative project. The application shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:

(a) A description of the cooperative project, including the programs, services, and administrative activities that will be operated jointly;

(b) The improvements in curriculum offerings and educational opportunities expected to result from the establishment of the proposed cooperative project;

(c) A list of any statutory requirements or administrative rules which are considered financial disincentives to the establishment of cooperative projects and which would impede the operation of the proposed cooperative project; and the financial impact to the school districts and the state expected to result by the granting of a waiver from such statutory requirements or administrative rules;

(d) An assessment of community support for the proposed cooperative project, which assessment shall include each community affected by the proposed cooperative project; and

(e) A plan for evaluating the educational and cost-effectiveness of the proposed cooperative project, including curriculum offerings and staffing patterns.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall review the application before the applicant school districts may commence the proposed cooperative project.

In reviewing applications, the superintendent shall be limited to: (a) The granting of waivers from statutory requirements, for which the superintendent of public instruction has the express power to implement pursuant to the adoption of rules, or administrative rules that need to be waived in order for the proposed cooperative project to be implemented: PROVIDED, That no statutory requirement or administrative rule dealing with health, safety, or civil rights may be waived; and (b) ensuring the technical accuracy of the application.

Any waiver granted by the superintendent of public instruction shall be reviewed and may be renewed by the superintendent every five years subject to the participating districts submitting a new application pursuant to this section.

(3) If additional eligible school districts wish to participate in an existing cooperative project the cooperative project as a whole shall reapply for review by the superintendent of public instruction.

[ 1990 c 33 s 368; 1988 c 268 s 4. Formerly RCW 28A.100.084.]

NOTES:

Findings—Severability—1988 c 268: See notes following RCW 28A.340.010.